dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- ढ्याउ; ढ्याउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढ्याउ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एक्कैछिन; एक्कैछिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एक्कैछिन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नपुगीञ्जेल; नपुगीञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नपुगीञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संयोगवस; संयोगवस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संयोगवस__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आखाँभरी; आखाँभरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आखाँभरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- असीमपूर्व; असीमपूर्व; 1 -->
    <pardef n="असीमपूर्व__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बलजफ्ती; बलजफ्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बलजफ्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यक्तिभन्दा; व्यक्तिभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यक्तिभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकछिन; एकछिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकछिन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनौं; दिनौं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनौं__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकपट्टि; एकपट्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकपट्टि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यथाशक्य; यथाशक्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यथाशक्य__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रचलनभन्दा; प्रचलनभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रचलनभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्यथा; अन्यथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्यथा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धेरभन्दा; धेरभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धेरभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तीमध्ये; तीमध्ये; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तीमध्ये__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यथावत्; यथावत्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यथावत्__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फिस्स; फिस्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फिस्स__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुसुक्क; लुसुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुसुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरूद्ध; विरूद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरूद्ध__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिला; पहिला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिला; पहिला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिला__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फु; फु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फु__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खितिति; खितिति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खितिति__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनायाशै; अनायाशै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनायाशै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघाडि; अघाडि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघाडि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आमरण; आमरण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आमरण__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्तिखेरै; उत्तिखेरै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्तिखेरै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लग-लग; लग-लग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लग-लग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्वानुरुप; पूर्वानुरुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्वानुरुप__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झलमल; झलमल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झलमल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पालैपालो; पालैपालो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पालैपालो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- च्वाक्क; च्वाक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="च्वाक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अफिसरभन्दा; अफिसरभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अफिसरभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घुटुक्क; घुटुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घुटुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्भवत; सम्भवत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्भवत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्वाँऽऽ; क्वाँऽऽ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्वाँऽऽ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अवश्य; अवश्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अवश्य__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इच्छानुसार; इच्छानुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इच्छानुसार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आवश्यकताभन्दा; आवश्यकताभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आवश्यकताभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधिकारभन्दा; अधिकारभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अधिकारभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तदनन्तर; तदनन्तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तदनन्तर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाउछिन; पाउछिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाउछिन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फिर्रर; फिर्रर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फिर्रर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ढ्याउ"><i>ढ्याउ</i><par n="ढ्याउ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एक्कैछिन"><i>एक्कैछिन</i><par n="एक्कैछिन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नपुगीञ्जेल"><i>नपुगीञ्जेल</i><par n="नपुगीञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="संयोगवस"><i>संयोगवस</i><par n="संयोगवस__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आखाँभरी"><i>आखाँभरी</i><par n="आखाँभरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="असीमपूर्व"><i>असीमपूर्व</i><par n="असीमपूर्व__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बलजफ्ती"><i>बलजफ्ती</i><par n="बलजफ्ती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यक्तिभन्दा"><i>व्यक्तिभन्दा</i><par n="व्यक्तिभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकछिन"><i>एकछिन</i><par n="एकछिन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनौं"><i>दिनौं</i><par n="दिनौं__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकपट्टि"><i>एकपट्टि</i><par n="एकपट्टि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यथाशक्य"><i>यथाशक्य</i><par n="यथाशक्य__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रचलनभन्दा"><i>प्रचलनभन्दा</i><par n="प्रचलनभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्यथा"><i>अन्यथा</i><par n="अन्यथा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="धेरभन्दा"><i>धेरभन्दा</i><par n="धेरभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तीमध्ये"><i>तीमध्ये</i><par n="तीमध्ये__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यथावत्"><i>यथावत्</i><par n="यथावत्__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फिस्स"><i>फिस्स</i><par n="फिस्स__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लुसुक्क"><i>लुसुक्क</i><par n="लुसुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विरूद्ध"><i>विरूद्ध</i><par n="विरूद्ध__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिला"><i>पहिला</i><par n="पहिला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिला"><i>पहिला</i><par n="पहिला__"/></e>
    <e lm="फु"><i>फु</i><par n="फु__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खितिति"><i>खितिति</i><par n="खितिति__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अनायाशै"><i>अनायाशै</i><par n="अनायाशै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघाडि"><i>अघाडि</i><par n="अघाडि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आमरण"><i>आमरण</i><par n="आमरण__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तिखेरै"><i>उत्तिखेरै</i><par n="उत्तिखेरै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लग-लग"><i>लग-लग</i><par n="लग-लग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्वानुरुप"><i>पूर्वानुरुप</i><par n="पूर्वानुरुप__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झलमल"><i>झलमल</i><par n="झलमल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पालैपालो"><i>पालैपालो</i><par n="पालैपालो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="च्वाक्क"><i>च्वाक्क</i><par n="च्वाक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अफिसरभन्दा"><i>अफिसरभन्दा</i><par n="अफिसरभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घुटुक्क"><i>घुटुक्क</i><par n="घुटुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्भवत"><i>सम्भवत</i><par n="सम्भवत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्वाँऽऽ"><i>क्वाँऽऽ</i><par n="क्वाँऽऽ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अवश्य"><i>अवश्य</i><par n="अवश्य__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="इच्छानुसार"><i>इच्छानुसार</i><par n="इच्छानुसार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आवश्यकताभन्दा"><i>आवश्यकताभन्दा</i><par n="आवश्यकताभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिकारभन्दा"><i>अधिकारभन्दा</i><par n="अधिकारभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तदनन्तर"><i>तदनन्तर</i><par n="तदनन्तर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पाउछिन"><i>पाउछिन</i><par n="पाउछिन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फिर्रर"><i>फिर्रर</i><par n="फिर्रर__adv"/></e>
